Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.020

Department authority—Rules.

The department shall administer and carry out the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted hereunder, and it has the power and authority to:

(1) Supervise the receiving, handling, conditioning, weighing, storage, and shipping of all commodities;

(2) Supervise the inspection and grading of commodities;

(3) Approve or disapprove the facilities, including scales, of all warehouses;

(4) Approve or disapprove all rates and charges for the handling, storage, and shipment of all commodities;

(5) Investigate all complaints of fraud in the operation of any warehouse;

(6) Examine, inspect, and audit, during ordinary business hours, any warehouse licensed under this chapter, including all commodities therein and examine, inspect, audit, or record all books, documents, and records;

(7) Examine, inspect, and audit during ordinary business hours, all books, documents, and records, and examine, inspect, audit, or record records of any grain dealer licensed hereunder at the grain dealer's principal office or headquarters;

(8) Inspect at reasonable times any warehouse or storage facility where commodities are received, handled, conditioned, stored, or shipped, including all commodities stored therein and all books, documents, and records in order to determine whether or not such facility should be licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(9) Inspect at reasonable times any grain dealer's books, documents, and records in order to determine whether or not the grain dealer should be licensed under this chapter;

(10) Administer oaths and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses, and/or the production of books, documents, and records anywhere in the state pursuant to a hearing relative to the purpose and provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel, as provided in chapter 2.40 RCW;

(11) Adopt rules establishing inspection standards and procedures for grains and commodities;

(12) Adopt rules regarding the identification of commodities by the use of confetti or other similar means so that such commodities may be readily identified if stolen or removed in violation of the provisions of this chapter from a warehouse or if otherwise unlawfully transported;

(13) Adopt all the necessary rules for carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter. The adoption of rules under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act. When adopting rules in respect to the provisions of this chapter, the director shall hold a public hearing and shall to the best of his or her ability consult with persons and organizations or interests who will be affected thereby, and any final rule adopted as a result of the hearing shall be designed to promote the provisions of this chapter and shall be reasonable and necessary and based upon needs and conditions of the industry, and shall be for the purpose of promoting the well-being of the industry to be regulated and the general welfare of the people of the state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 599; 1989 c 354 s 45; 1983 c 305 s 17; 1963 c 124 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.